Alaska, session 34, SB16.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 42.05.381(e) is amended to read: 06 (e) The commission shall adopt regulations for electric cooperatives, [AND 07 FOR] local exchange telephone utilities, and refuse utilities, setting a range for 08 adjustment of rates by a simplified rate filing procedure. A cooperative, [OR] 09 telephone utility, or refuse utility may apply for permission to adjust its rates over a 10 period of time under the simplified rate filing procedure regulations. The commission 11 shall grant the application if the cooperative, [OR] telephone utility, or refuse utility 12 satisfies the requirements of the regulations. The commission shall adopt 13 regulations specific to refuse utilities that provide for sufficient public notice and 14 an opportunity for ratepayers to meaningfully comment on rate filings. The 01 commission may review implementation of the simplified rate filing procedure at 02 reasonable intervals and may revoke permission to use the procedure or require 03 modification of the rates to correct an error. In this subsection, "refuse utility" 04 means a utility furnishing collection and disposal service of garbage, refuse, 05 trash, or other waste material to the public for compensation. 06 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.